src/fst/stems/interjections.lexc
!! # Interjections

LEXICON aj
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** adds tag 
+Interj: # ;  !!≈ * @CODE@ 

LEXICON Interjection
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** lists the interjections
a aj "o" ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
agh aj "ugh" ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
aha aj "aha" ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
ass aj "how" ; !! ...
assa aj "how" ;
avond aj "avaunt, begone" ;
awotta aj "behold" ;
ay aj "hey, hi" ;
dar aj "what, eh, why" ;
darwar aj "beware" ;
ehan aj "alas" ;
ellas aj "alas" ;
farawel aj "farewell" ;
farwel aj "farewell" ;
fi aj "fie" ;
go aj "woe" ;
gwev aj "woe to him" ;
ha aj "ha" ;
harow aj "help" ;
hayl aj "hail" ;
hedj aj "stop, halt" ;
ho aj "stop, halt" ;
hou aj "hello" ;
knakk aj "snap" ;
mal aj "pest" ;
malbew aj "plague take" ;
na aj "no" ;
ogh aj "oh, alas" ;
ott aj "see, behold, lo" ;
otta aj "behold" ;
ottavy aj "behold me" ;
ottajy aj "behold thee" ;
ottava aj "behold him" ;
ottahi aj "behold her" ;
ottani aj "behold us" ;
ottahwi aj "behold you" ;
ottensi aj "behold them" ;
ottensa aj "see there" ;
ottomma aj "see here" ;
out aj "out, oh" ;
pes aj "peace!" ;
prouyt aj "(call to cattle)" ;
soweth aj "alas" ;
tetivali aj "nonsense, tut-tut" ;
tru aj "woe" ;
wel aj "well" ;
ya aj "yes" ;
ye aj "yes" ;

!! Words from 2020 dictionary

'Ria aj "good heavens" ;
dar aj "why" ;
diharesow aj "sorry" ;
ea aj "yes" ;
en-sol aj "arise" ;
gromerci aj "thanks a lot" ;
nantei aj "surely not" ;
omjersyewgh aj "make yourselves comfortable" ;
ot aj "here is" ;
ottena aj "there is" ;
ottobma aj "here is" ;
parde aj "by God" ;
voydama aj "I'm off" ;
well aj "well" ;
yn-sol aj "arise" ;
you aj "hi" ;
yow aj "hi" ;
